Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.305.035

Joint report to the legislature.

(1) By October 15th of each even-numbered year, the state board of education and the professional educator standards board shall submit a joint report to the legislative education committees, the governor, and the superintendent of public instruction. The report shall address the progress the boards have made and the obstacles they have encountered, individually and collectively, in the work of achieving the goals in RCW 28A.150.210.

(2) The state board of education shall include the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative education committees in board communications so that the legislature can be kept apprised of the discussions and proposed actions of the board.

[ 2006 c 263 s 103; 2005 c 497 s 103.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.